District of Columbia statutes.
3-1407

Repealed

Power to develop, construct and maintain facilities.

Repealed.

Aug. 23, 1994, D.C. Law 10-152, § 8, 41 DCR 4636
Sept. 28, 1994, D.C. Law 10-188, § 601(c), 41 DCR 5333
Mar. 23, 1995, D.C. Law 10-246, § 8(f), 42 DCR 452
June 6, 1998, D.C. Law 12-115, § 2, 45 DCR 1957
Mar. 3, 2010, D.C. Law 18-111, § 2082(j), 57 DCR 181
Construction of Law 10-152: See note to § 3-1401.
For temporary (90 day) repeal, see § 2082(j) of Fiscal Year Budget Support Congressional Review Emergency Amendment Act of 2009 (D.C. Act 18-260, January 4, 2010, 57 DCR 345).
For temporary (90 day) repeal, see § 2082(j) of Fiscal Year 2010 Budget Support Second Emergency Act of 2009 (D.C. Act 18-207, October 15, 2009, 56 DCR 8234).
For temporary amendment of section, see § 8 (f) of the Recreation Emergency Act of 1995 (D.C. Act 11-20, February 28, 1995, 42 DCR 1175).
1981 Ed., § 2-4007.